Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2865.1 of Title 68, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this act:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4305 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. “Active construction” means any property that is being
constructed or renovated that has yet to place in service all of its
buildings;
2. “Audit” means an audit of the financial operations of the
property provided by a third-party certified public accountant or
financial statements certified by the organization to be true and
accurate;
3. “Lease-up” means any property that has an actual occupancy
of less than ninety percent (90%), that is under or has been under
active construction, and is in the process of leasing units;
4. “Net operating income” means gross restricted rent income
from the property minus operating expenses and replacement reserve
deposits, before debt service, depreciation, amortization, capital
expenditures, and income taxes;
5. “Organization” means a property owner meeting the
requirements under subsection B of this section; and
6. “Restricted rent” means the actual rental rates that are
restricted by the programs described in subsection B of this
section.
B. This act shall only apply to real property owned by an
organization:
1. For the purpose of renting the property to a low-income or
moderate-income individual or family who satisfies the income
eligibility requirements of the organization;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4305 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. That was financed in whole or in part through allocation of
the federal low-income housing tax credit authorized pursuant to 26
U.S.C., Section 42, and is subject to a land use agreement or
regulatory agreement that has not expired or been terminated;
3. That does not receive exempt treatment under Section 2887 of
Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
4. The owner of which has not entered into any agreement with
any taxing unit to make payments to the taxing unit instead of taxes
on the property.
C. In determining the fair cash value of a property described
in subsection B of this section, the county assessor shall determine
the fair cash value of property that is under active construction or
lease-up on January 1 of the current tax year in the manner provided
by Section 8 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution using the
restricted rent income approach method, provided that the county
assessor shall estimate the net operating income of the property
based on the projected restricted rent income and expenses of the
organization for the first full year of operation, as adjusted to
reflect the average occupancy during the lease-up period.
D. In determining the fair cash value for a property for any
subsequent tax year, the county assessor shall determine the fair
cash value of the property based upon the restricted rent income
approach method utilizing the net operating income of the property
from the audit provided by the organization.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4305 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

E. In determining the fair cash value of property described in
subsection B of this section, the county assessor shall not consider
the value or any amount of any federal or state low-income housing
tax credits as a component of the fair cash value or income
attributable to the property.
F. The county assessor shall determine a formal process for
determining market-derived capitalization rates to be applied to the
net operating income of the property based on project and investor
data for comparable properties with restricted rents.
G. Not later than May 1 of each year, the organization shall
deliver to the county assessor the audit for the preceding year.
The county assessor may extend the deadline for good cause shown.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2887, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 260, O.S.L. 2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 2887), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2887. The following property shall be exempt from ad
valorem taxation:
1. All property of the United States, and such property as may
be exempt by reason of treaty stipulations existing at statehood
between the Indians and the United States government, or by reason
of federal laws in effect at statehood, during the time such
treaties or federal laws are in force and effect. In instances
where a federal agency has obtained title to property through
foreclosure, voluntary or involuntary liquidation or bankruptcy,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4305 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

whic h was previously subject to ad valorem taxation, the property
may continue to be assessed for ad valorem taxes if such federal
agency has agreed to pay such taxes;
2. All property of this state, and of the counties, school
districts, and municipalities of this state, including property
acquired for the use of such entities pursuant to the terms of a
lease-purchase agreement which provides for the passage of title or
the release of security interest, if applicable, upon payment of all
rental payments and an additional nominal amount;
3. All property of any college or school, provided such
property is devoted exclusively and directly to the appropriate
objects of such college or school within this state and all property
used exclusively for nonprofit schools and colleges;
4. The books, papers, furniture and scientific or other
apparatus pertaining to any institution, college or society referred
to in paragraph 3 of this section, and devoted exclusively and
directly for the purpose above contemplated, and the like property
of students in any such institution or college, while such property
is used for the purpose of their education;
5. All fraternal orphan homes and other orphan homes;
6. All property used for free public libraries, free museums,
public cemeteries, or free public schools;
7. All property used exclusively and directly for fraternal or
religious purposes within this state. For purposes of this
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4305 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

para graph, an exemption based on religious purposes includes real
property owned by a church which allows its premises to be used by
an entity if such entity is not required to make rental payments to
the church, is not required to execute a formal lease agreement with
respect to its occupancy of the church premises and conducts
instruction of children from any or all grades for ages preschool
through twelfth grade, including religious instruction consistent
with the doctrines of the church the premises of which are being
used for that purpose. For purposes of this paragraph, a
requirement by a church to be reimbursed by the entity for utility
expenses, janitorial services or similar expenses shall not be a
basis upon which to remove or deny the exempt status of church
property. Exempt status of church property shall not be removed nor
shall church property be allocated between taxable and exempt status
based on the use of church premises by an entity as described by
this paragraph.
For purposes of administering the exemption authorized by this
section and in order to determine whether a single family
residential property is used exclusively and directly for fraternal
or religious purposes, the fair cash value of a single family
residential property, for which an exemption is claimed as
authorized by this subsection section, in excess of Five Hundred
Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) for the applicable assessment year
shall not be exempt from taxation;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4305 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

8. All property of any charitable institution organized or
chartered under the laws of this state as a nonprofit or charitable
institution, provided the net income from such property is used
exclusively within this state for charitable purposes and no part of
such income inures to the benefit of any private stockholder,
including property which is not leased or rented to any person other
than a governmental body, a charitable institution or a member of
the general public who is authorized to be a tenant in property
owned by a charitable institution under Section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and which includes, but
is not limited to, an institution that either:
a. additionally satisfies the income standards set forth
in Internal Revenue Service Revenue Procedure 96-32,
which may be audited by the county assessor of the
applicable county, in addition to other requirements
of this subparagraph, as a condition of obtaining and
maintaining the exemption, if:
(1) the property provides residential rental
accommodations regardless of whether services or
meals are provided, and
(2) the property:
(a) is occupied as of the applicable January 1
assessment date if the structure is a
single-family dwelling, or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4305 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(b) has an average seventy-five percent (75%)
occupancy rate, based upon the total number
of units suitable for occupancy, during the
calendar year preceding the applicable
January 1 assessment date if the property
contains multiple structures suitable for
multi-family multifamily housing. The owner
of any property subject to the occupancy
requirements prescribed herein shall submit
a report to the county assessor of the
county in which the property is located no
later than December 15 each year regarding
the occupancy rate for the preceding eleven
(11) months. If the report indicates that
the average occupancy rate was less than
seventy-five percent (75%), the county
assessor shall determine the taxable value
of the property for the succeeding
assessment year and the property shall not
be exempt for any subsequent assessment year
unless the average occupancy rate is at
least seventy-five percent (75%) during the
succeeding eleven-month period. Except as
provided in Section 178.6 of Title 60 of the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4305 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Oklahoma Statutes, no asset consisting of a
single-family or multi-family multifamily
dwelling unit owned by an entity the
property of which would otherwise be exempt
pursuant to this subparagraph a of this
paragraph shall be exempt from ad valorem
taxation if any such dwelling unit was
improved with or acquired with any portion
of proceeds from the sale of obligations
issued by any entity organized pursuant to
Section 176 of Title 60 of the Oklahoma
Statutes if the interest income derived from
such obligations is exempt from federal
income tax, or
b. (1) for a facility constructed prior to January 1,
2006, is a continuum of care retirement community
providing housing for the aged, licensed under
Oklahoma law, owned by a nonprofit entity
recognized by the Internal Revenue Service as a
Section 501(c)(3) tax-exempt entity and located
in a county with a population of more than five
hundred thousand (500,000) according to the
latest Federal Decennial Census, and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4305 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(2) (a) for a facility in which construction was
completed on or after January 1, 2006, is:
i. a continuum of care retirement
community providing housing for the
aged, licensed under Oklahoma law,
ii. owned by a nonprofit entity recognized
by the Internal Revenue Service as a
Section 501(c)(3) tax-exempt entity,
and
iii. located in any county of the state
regardless of population, or
(b) for a facility other than a facility
described by division (1) of this
subparagraph b of this paragraph and which
is partially or fully constructed prior to
January 1, 2006, is:
i. owned and occupied on or after January
1, 2006, by an entity that operates a
continuum of care retirement community
providing housing for the aged,
licensed under Oklahoma law,
ii. owned by a nonprofit entity recognized
by the Internal Revenue Service as a

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4305 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Section 501(c)(3) tax-exempt entity,
and
iii. is located in any county of the state
regardless of population.
For the purposes of this paragraph, the requirement that no part of
such income inures to the benefit of any private stockholder or
individual shall not be construed to prohibit the payment of
reasonable and necessary compensation for services rendered,
including but not limited to development, construction, financing,
or management services, provided such compensation is consistent
with fair market value and in furtherance of the charitable purpose
of the property;
9. All property used exclusively and directly for charitable
purposes within this state, provided the charity using said such
property does not pay any rent or remuneration to the owner thereof
unless the owner is a charitable institution described in Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section
501(c)(3), or a veterans’ organization described in Section
501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section
501(c)(19);
10. All property of any hospital established, organized and
operated by any person, partnership, association, organization,
trust, or corporation, as a nonprofit and charitable hospital,
provided the property and net income from such hospital are used
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4305 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

dire ctly, solely, and exclusively within this state for charitable
purposes and that no part of such income shall inure to the benefit
of any individual, person, partner, shareholder, or stockholder, and
provided further that such hospital facilities shall be open to the
public without discrimination as to race, color or creed and
regardless of ability to pay, and that such hospital is licensed and
otherwise complies with the laws of this state relating to the
licensing and regulation of hospitals;
11. All libraries and office equipment of ministers of the
Gospel actively engaged in ministerial work in the State of Oklahoma
this state, where said such libraries and office equipment are being
used by said such ministers in their ministerial work, shall be
deemed to be used exclusively for religious purposes and are
declared to be within the meaning of the term “religious purposes”
as used in Article X, Section 6 of Article X of the Oklahoma
Constitution of the State of Oklahoma;
12. Household goods, tools, implements and livestock of every
person maintaining a home, not exceeding One Hundred Dollars
($100.00) in value or One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) in value if
Article X, Section 6 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution
provides for an exemption in such amount; and in addition thereto,
there shall be exempt from taxation on personal property the further
sum of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) to all enlisted and
commissioned personnel, whether on active duty or honorably
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4305 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

disc harged, who served in the Armed Forces of the United States
during:
a. the Spanish-American War,
b. the period beginning on April 6, 1917, and ending on
July 2, 1921,
c. the period beginning on December 6, 1941, and ending
on such date as the state of national emergency as
declared by the President of the United States shall
cease to exist December 31, 1946, or
d. any other or future period during which a state of
national emergency shall have been or shall be
declared to exist by the Congress or the President of
the United States.
All surviving spouses made so by the death of such enlisted or
commissioned personnel, who are bona fide residents of this state,
shall be entitled to the above additional exemption provided in this
paragraph;
13. Family portraits;
14. All food and fuel provided in kind for the use of the
family not to exceed provisions for one (1) year’s time, and all
grain and forage necessary to maintain for one (1) year the
livestock used to provide food for the family. No person from whom
pay is received or expected for board shall be considered a member
of the family within the intent and meaning of this paragraph;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4305 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

15. All growing crops; and
16. All game animals, fowl and reptile, which are not being
grown for food or sale and which are kept exclusively for
propagation or exhibition, in private grounds or public parks in
this state.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON REVENUE AND TAXATION
April 20, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS

















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4305 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)